District of Columbia statutes.
47-2815

Pyroxylin.

(a)

Owners or managers of establishments where pyroxylin is kept or stored for painting or spraying shall pay a license fee of $50 per annum. No license shall issue hereunder without the approval of the Fire Marshal of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as an Environmental Materials endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 624, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 15
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 552, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(h), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(12), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(E), 50 DCR 6913

History

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 47-2815.
1973 Ed., § 47-2315.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “an Environmental Materials endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Environmental Materials endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(E) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Emergency Legislation